Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-103
Knowledge; notice.

(RULLCA 103) (a) A person knows a fact
when the person:

(1) has actual knowledge
of it; or

(2)
is deemed to know it under subdivision (d)(1) of this section or law other
than the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act.

(b) A person has notice
of a fact when the person:

(1) has reason to know the fact from all of the facts
known to the person at the time in question; or

(2) is deemed to have notice of
the fact under subdivision (d)(2) of this section.

(c) A person notifies another of
a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary
course, whether or not the other person knows the fact.

(d) A person that is
not a member is deemed:

(1)
to know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided
in subsection (g) of section 21-127; and

(2) to have notice of a limited liability company's:

(A) dissolution, ninety
days after a statement of dissolution under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of section
21-148 becomes effective;

(B)
termination, ninety days after a statement of termination under subdivision
(b)(2)(E) of section 21-148 becomes effective; and

(C) merger, conversion, or domestication,
ninety days after articles of merger, conversion, or domestication under sections
21-170 to 21-184 become effective.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 3.